Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2012
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Signing false document; penalty.

(1) A person commits an offense if he or she signs a document he or she knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

(2) An offense under this section shall be a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 12.